Illinois, session 104th, SB3953.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 55-12025 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-12025 new)7    Sec. 5-12025. Surety bond for commercial solar energy 8facilities.9    (a) As used in this Section, "commercial solar energy 10facility" has the meaning given to that term in Section 115-12020.12    (b) A county board may not allow a person to construct a 13commercial solar energy facility within the county unless the 14person has purchased a surety bond from the Environmental 15Protection Agency or the county that is sufficient to pay for 16the deconstruction of the commercial solar energy facility and 17any environmental damage caused by the construction and 18operation of the commercial solar energy facility.19    (c) The county board or the Environmental Protection 20Agency shall determine the amount of the surety bond necessary 21to comply with this Section on a case-by-case basis. The 22county board or the Environmental Protection Agency shall 23consider the size of the commercial solar energy facility when   SB3953- 2 -LRB104 18280 RTM 31720 b1determining the amount of the surety bond that a person 2seeking to construct a commercial solar energy facility must 3purchase.